FST/slp/morph_slp_adj.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
%+ADJ
%+SPRL

LEXICON Root
metə adjective;
okĩ adjective;
wuʔũ adjective;
ləmeʔ adjective;
gehə̃ adjective;
knə̃ʔə̃ adjective;
briŋĩ adjective;
blara adjective;
gələ adjective;
krəkũ adjective;
pə̃ũpə̃ũ adjective;

LEXICON adjective
%+ADJ%+SPRL:^=aʔ #;
